District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-2602.15

Failure to make reports or pay taxes or fees.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 4, 1922, 42 Stat. 408, ch. 93, title V, § 15
Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 401(b), 50 DCR 330

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1415.
1973 Ed., § 35-1115.